Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1001
Proceedings to be public.

All judicial proceedings of all courts established in this state must be open to the attendance of the public unless otherwise specially provided by statute.

Laws 1879, § 35, p. 89;

R.S.1913, § 1179;

C.S.1922, § 1093;

C.S.1929, § 27-311;

R.S.1943, § 24-311;

Laws 1969, c. 175, § 1, p. 756;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-311.

Pretrial proceedings in criminal cases may be closed to the public, including representatives of the news media, unless the presiding officer determines there is no substantial likelihood of interference with defendant's right to a fair trial. State v. Simants, 194 Neb. 783, 236 N.W.2d 794 (1975).